Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 11 Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-13.1-1101.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this part:

“Acquired entity” means the entity, all of one or more classes or series of interests of which are acquired in an interest exchange.

“Acquiring entity” means the entity that acquires all of one or more classes or series of interests of the acquired entity in an interest exchange.

“Conversion” means a transaction authorized by subpart 4.

“Converted entity” means the converting entity as it continues in existence after a conversion.

“Converting entity” means the domestic entity that approves a plan of conversion pursuant to §

7-13.1-1143

or the foreign entity that approves a conversion pursuant to the law of its jurisdiction of formation.

“Distributional interest” means the right under an unincorporated entity’s organic law and organic rules to receive distributions from the entity.

“Domestic”, with respect to an entity, means governed as to its internal affairs by the law of this state.

“Domesticated limited partnership” means the domesticating limited partnership as it continues in existence after a domestication.

“Domesticating limited partnership” means the domestic limited partnership that approves a plan of domestication pursuant to §

7-13.1-1153

or the foreign limited partnership that approves a domestication pursuant to the law of its jurisdiction of formation.

“Domestication” means a transaction authorized by subpart 5.

“Entity”:

Means:

A business corporation;

A nonprofit corporation;

A general partnership, including a limited liability partnership;

A limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership;

A limited liability company;

A general cooperative association;

A limited cooperative association;

An unincorporated nonprofit association;

A statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other person that has:

A legal existence separate from any interest holder of that person; or

The power to acquire an interest in real property in its own name; and

Does not include:

An individual;

A trust with a predominantly donative purpose or a charitable trust;

An association or relationship that is not an entity listed in subsection (11)(i) of this section and is not a partnership under the rules stated in §

7-12-18

[repealed] or a similar provision of the law of another jurisdiction;

A decedent’s estate; or

A government or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

“Filing entity” means an entity whose formation requires the filing of a public organic record. The term does not include a limited liability partnership.

“Foreign”, with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the law of a jurisdiction other than this state.

“Governance interest” means a right under the organic law or organic rules of an unincorporated entity, other than as a governor, agent, assignee, or proxy, to:

Receive or demand access to information concerning, or the books and records of, the entity;

Vote for or consent to the election of the governors of the entity; or

Receive notice of or vote on or consent to an issue involving the internal affairs of the entity.

“Governor” means:

A director of a business corporation or an officer of a business corporation that has no board of directors;

A director or trustee of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A manager of a manager-managed limited liability company;

A member of a member-managed limited liability company;

A director of a general cooperative association;

A director of a limited cooperative association;

A manager of an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A trustee of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other person under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised and under whose direction the activities and affairs of the entity are managed pursuant to the organic law and organic rules of the entity.

“Interest” means:

A share in a business corporation;

A membership in a nonprofit corporation;

A partnership interest in a general partnership;

A partnership interest in a limited partnership;

A membership interest in a limited liability company;

A share in a general cooperative association;

A member’s interest in a limited cooperative association;

A membership in an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

A governance interest or distributional interest in any other type of unincorporated entity.

“Interest exchange” means a transaction authorized by subpart 3.

“Interest holder” means:

A shareholder of a business corporation;

A member of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A limited partner of a limited partnership;

A member of a limited liability company;

A shareholder of a general cooperative association;

A member of a limited cooperative association;

A member of an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A beneficiary or beneficial owner of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other direct holder of an interest.

“Interest holder liability” means:

Personal liability for a liability of an entity which is imposed on a person:

Solely by reason of the status of the person as an interest holder; or

By the organic rules of the entity which make one or more specified interest holders or categories of interest holders liable in their capacity as interest holders for all or specified liabilities of the entity; or

An obligation of an interest holder under the organic rules of an entity to contribute to the entity.

“Merger” means a transaction authorized by subpart 2.

“Merging entity” means an entity that is a party to a merger and exists immediately before the merger becomes effective.

“Organic law” means the law of an entity’s jurisdiction of formation governing the internal affairs of the entity.

“Organic rules” means the public organic record and private organic rules of an entity.

“Plan” means a plan of merger, plan of interest exchange, plan of conversion, or plan of domestication.

“Plan of conversion” means a plan under §

7-13.1-1142

.

“Plan of domestication” means a plan under §

7-13.1-1152

.

“Plan of interest exchange” means a plan under §

7-13.1-1132

.

“Plan of merger” means a plan under §

7-13.1-1122

.

“Private organic rules” means the rules, whether or not in a record, that govern the internal affairs of an entity, are binding on all its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic record, if any. The term includes:

The bylaws of a business corporation;

The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation;

The partnership agreement of a general partnership;

The partnership agreement of a limited partnership;

The operating agreement of a limited liability company;

The bylaws of a general cooperative association;

The bylaws of a limited cooperative association;

The governing principles of an unincorporated nonprofit association; and

The trust instrument of a statutory trust or similar rules of a business trust or a common-law business trust.

“Protected agreement” means:

A record evidencing indebtedness and any related agreement in effect on January 1, 2023;

An agreement that is binding on an entity on January 1, 2023;

The organic rules of an entity in effect on January 1, 2023; or

An agreement that is binding on any of the governors or interest holders of an entity on January 1, 2023.

“Public organic record” means the record the filing of which by the secretary of state is required to form an entity and any amendment to or restatement of that record. The term includes:

The articles of incorporation of a business corporation;

The articles of incorporation of a nonprofit corporation;

The certificate of limited partnership of a limited partnership;

The certificate of organization of a limited liability company;

The articles of incorporation of a general cooperative association;

The articles of organization of a limited cooperative association; and

The certificate of trust of a statutory trust or similar record of a business trust.

“Registered foreign entity” means a foreign entity that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a record filed by the secretary of state.

“Statement of conversion” means a statement under §

7-13.1-1145

.

“Statement of domestication” means a statement under §

7-13.1-1155

.

“Statement of interest exchange” means a statement under §

7-13.1-1135

.

“Statement of merger” means a statement under §

7-13.1-1125

.

“Surviving entity” means the entity that continues in existence after or is created by a merger.

“Type of entity” means a generic form of entity:

Recognized at common law; or

Formed under an organic law, whether or not some entities formed under that organic law are subject to provisions of that law that create different categories of the form of entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1102.
Relationship of part 11 to other laws. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This part 11 does not authorize an act prohibited by, and does not affect the application or requirements of, law other than this part 11.

A transaction effected under this part 11 may not create or impair a right, duty, or obligation of a person under the statutory law of this state relating to a change in control, takeover, business combination, control-share acquisition, or similar transaction involving a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating business corporation unless:

If the corporation does not survive the transaction, the transaction satisfies any requirements of the law; or

If the corporation survives the transaction, the approval of the plan is by a vote of the shareholders or directors which would be sufficient to create or impair the right, duty, or obligation directly under the law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1103.
Required notice or approval. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic or foreign entity that is required to give notice to, or obtain the approval of, a governmental agency or officer of this state to be a party to a merger must give the notice or obtain the approval to be a party to an interest exchange, conversion, or domestication.

Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state by a domestic or foreign entity immediately before a transaction under this part 11 becomes effective may not, as a result of the transaction, be diverted from the objects for which it was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred unless, to the extent required by or pursuant to the law of this state concerning cy pres or other law dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets, the entity obtains an appropriate order of the superior court specifying the disposition of the property.

A bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance which is made to a merging entity that is not the surviving entity and which takes effect or remains payable after the merger inures to the surviving entity.

A trust obligation that would govern property if transferred to a nonsurviving entity applies to property that is transferred to the surviving entity under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1104.
Nonexclusivity. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The fact that a transaction under this part 11 produces a certain result does not preclude the same result from being accomplished in any other manner permitted by law other than this part 11.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1105.
Reference to external facts. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan may refer to facts ascertainable outside the plan if the manner in which the facts will operate upon the plan is specified in the plan. The facts may include the occurrence of an event or a determination or action by a person, whether or not the event, determination, or action is within the control of a party to the transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1106.
Appraisal rights. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

An interest holder of a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating limited partnership is entitled to contractual appraisal rights in connection with a transaction under this part 11 to the extent provided in:

The partnership agreement; or

The plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1107.
Excluded entities and transactions; other applicable law [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This part 11 may not be used to effect a transaction that is prohibited by law of this state other than this chapter.

If law of this state other than this chapter applies to a transaction that is otherwise within the scope of this part 11, the transaction is still subject to such other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

Subpart 2 Merger [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-13.1-1121.
Merger authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this subpart:

One or more domestic limited partnerships may merge with one or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

Two (2) or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic limited partnership.

By complying with the provisions of this subpart applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under this subpart or may be the surviving entity in such a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1122.
Plan of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited partnership may become a party to a merger under this subpart by approving a plan of merger. The plan must be in a record and contain:

As to each merging entity, its name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger, a statement to that effect and the entity’s name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

The manner of converting the interests in each party to the merger into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger, any proposed amendments to:

Its public organic record, if any; and

Its private organic rules that are, or are proposed to be, in a record;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger:

Its proposed public organic record, if any; and

The full text of its private organic rules that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the merger; and

Any other provision required by the law of a merging entity’s jurisdiction of formation or the organic rules of a merging entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1123.
Approval of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of merger is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic merging limited partnership, by all the partners of the partnership entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner of a domestic merging limited partnership which will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of a merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A merger involving a domestic merging entity that is not a limited partnership is not effective unless the merger is approved by that entity in accordance with its organic law.

A merger involving a foreign merging entity is not effective unless the merger is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1124.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of merger may be amended only with the consent of each party to the plan, except as otherwise provided in the plan.

A domestic merging limited partnership may approve an amendment of a plan of merger:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the merger is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by the interest holders of any party to the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the surviving entity that will be in effect immediately after the merger becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the surviving entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of merger has been approved and before a statement of merger becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic merging limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of merger is abandoned after a statement of merger has been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by a party to the plan, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the statement of merger becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the merger is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of each party to the plan of merger;

The date on which the statement of merger was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the merger has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1125.
Articles of merger — Effective date of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Articles of merger must be signed by each merging entity and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of merger must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of each merging entity that is not the surviving entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the surviving entity;

A statement that the merger was approved by each domestic merging entity, if any, in accordance with this subpart and by each foreign merging entity, if any, in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger and is a domestic filing entity, any amendment to its public organic record approved as part of the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment; and

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the surviving entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic limited partnership or another filing entity of record in the office of the secretary of state, a statement that the surviving or resulting other entity agrees that it may be served with process in Rhode Island in any action, suit or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic limited partnership that is to merge, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in the action, suit or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of the process is to be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service under this section on the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in §

7-13.1-121

are applicable, except that the plaintiff in any action, suit or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the articles of merger provided for in this section and any other address that the plaintiff elects to furnish, together with copies of the process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the surviving or resulting other business entity at all addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

7-13.1-121

.

A statement that the merging entity certifies that it has no outstanding tax obligations. As required by §§

7-13.1-213

,

7-16-67

and

44-11-26.1

, the merging entity has paid all fees and taxes.

If the surviving entity is a domestic limited partnership, the merger becomes effective when the articles of merger are effective. In all other cases, the merger becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the surviving entity; and

When the articles of merger is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1126.
Effect of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving entity continues or comes into existence;

Each merging entity that is not the surviving entity ceases to exist;

All property of each merging entity vests in the surviving entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of each merging entity are debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the surviving entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of merger, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each merging entity vest in the surviving entity;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

All its property continues to be vested in it without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

It remains subject to all its debts, obligations, and other liabilities; and

All its rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes continue to be vested in it;

The name of the surviving entity may be substituted for the name of any merging entity that is a party to any pending action or proceeding;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

Its public organic record, if any, is amended to the extent provided in the statement of merger; and

Its private organic rules that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger, its private organic rules become effective and:

If it is a filing entity, its public organic record becomes effective; and

If it is a limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification becomes effective; and

The interests in each merging entity which are to be converted in the merger are converted, and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of merger and to any appraisal rights they have under §

7-13.1-1106

and the merging entity’s organic law.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a merging entity, the merger does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the merging entity.

When a merger becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to any of the merging entities and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the merger has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of that entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective.

When a merger becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic merging limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The merger does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the merger became effective.

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the merger becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the merger had not occurred.

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic merging limited partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the merger had not occurred.

When a merger becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the surviving entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a domestic merging limited partnership as provided in §

7-13.1-121

.

When a merger becomes effective, the registration to do business in this state of any foreign merging entity that is not the surviving entity is canceled.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1131.
Interest exchange authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this subpart:

A domestic limited partnership may acquire all of one or more classes or series of interests of another domestic entity or a foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing; or

All of one or more classes or series of interests of a domestic limited partnership may be acquired by another domestic entity or a foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing.

By complying with the provisions of this subpart applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be the acquiring or acquired entity in an interest exchange under this subpart if the interest exchange is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to an interest exchange, the provision applies to an interest exchange in which the domestic limited partnership is the acquired entity as if the interest exchange were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2023.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1132.
Plan of interest exchange. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited partnership may be the acquired entity in an interest exchange under this subpart by approving a plan of interest exchange. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name of the acquired entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the acquiring entity;

The manner of converting the interests in the acquired entity into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

Any proposed amendments to:

The certificate of limited partnership of the acquired entity; and

The partnership agreement of the acquired entity that are, or are proposed to be, in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the interest exchange; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the acquired entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1133.
Approval of interest exchange. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of interest exchange is not effective unless it has been approved:

By all the partners of a domestic acquired limited partnership entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner of the domestic acquired limited partnership that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the interest exchange becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of an interest exchange or a merger in which some or all its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all of the partners; and

The partner consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

An interest exchange involving a domestic acquired entity that is not a limited partnership is not effective unless it is approved by the domestic entity in accordance with its organic law.

An interest exchange involving a foreign acquired entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

Except as otherwise provided in its organic law or organic rules, the interest holders of the acquiring entity are not required to approve the interest exchange.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1134.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of interest exchange. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of interest exchange may be amended only with the consent of each party to the plan, except as otherwise provided in the plan.

A domestic acquired limited partnership may approve an amendment of a plan of interest exchange:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the interest exchange is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the partners of the acquired partnership under the plan;

The certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement of the acquired partnership that will be in effect immediately after the interest exchange becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the partners of the acquired partnership under this chapter or the partnership agreement; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of interest exchange has been approved and before a statement of interest exchange becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic acquired limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of interest exchange is abandoned after a statement of interest exchange has been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the acquired limited partnership, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the statement of interest exchange becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the interest exchange is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the acquired partnership;

The date on which the statement of interest exchange was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the interest exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1135.
Statement of interest exchange — Effective date of interest exchange. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A statement of interest exchange must be signed by a domestic acquired limited partnership and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

A statement of interest exchange must contain:

The name of the acquired limited partnership;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the acquiring entity;

A statement that the plan of interest exchange was approved by the acquired limited partnership in accordance with this subpart; and

Any amendments to the acquired limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership approved as part of the plan of interest exchange.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

An interest exchange becomes effective when the statement of interest exchange is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1136.
Effect of interest exchange. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When an interest exchange in which the acquired entity is a domestic limited partnership becomes effective:

The interests in the acquired partnership which are the subject of the interest exchange are converted, and the partners holding those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of interest exchange and to any appraisal rights they have under §

7-13.1-1106

;

The acquiring entity becomes the interest holder of the interests in the acquired partnership stated in the plan of interest exchange to be acquired by the acquiring entity;

The certificate of limited partnership of the acquired partnership is amended to the extent provided in the statement of interest exchange; and

The provisions of the partnership agreement of the acquired partnership that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of interest exchange.

Except as otherwise provided in the certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement of a domestic acquired limited partnership, the interest exchange does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the acquired partnership.

When an interest exchange becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to a domestic acquired limited partnership and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the interest exchange has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the interest exchange becomes effective.

When an interest exchange becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic acquired limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The interest exchange does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the interest exchange became effective.

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the interest exchange becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the interest exchange had not occurred.

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic acquired partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the interest exchange had not occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1141.
Conversion authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this subpart, a domestic limited partnership may become:

A domestic entity that is a different type of entity; or

A foreign entity that is a different type of entity, if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

By complying with the provisions of this subpart applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity that is not a foreign limited partnership may become a domestic limited partnership if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to a conversion, the provision applies to a conversion of the partnership as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2023.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.